Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 10

Department of Finance and Administration

4-3-1001. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of finance and administration.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 2; 1961, ch. 97, § 1; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of finance and administration, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, see Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For an order clarifying Executive Orders Nos. 9 and 10 relative to the transfer of administrative staff from the department of mental health and mental retardation [department of mental health and developmental disabilities] to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 21 (July 29, 1999).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Acts 2016, ch. 846, § 5 provided that the division of benefits administration shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government no later than December 1, 2016, to present the clinical outcome measures report conducted by Aon Hewitt.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of finance and administration, §4-3-101.

4-3-1002. Commissioner.

The department of finance and administration shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 2; 1961, ch. 97, § 2; modified.

4-3-1003. Establishment and transfer of divisions.

To discharge the authority, powers and duties hereby imposed upon the department of finance and administration and the commissioner of the department, there are created within the department the following divisions:

The division of accounts;

The division of administration;

The division of benefits administration;

The division of budget;

The office of the inspector general; and

The division of strategic technology solutions.

The commissioner is authorized to assign to these divisions the duties imposed upon the department and the commissioner thereof. The commissioner is authorized to combine, consolidate or abolish any of these divisions, or to create such new divisions as are necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and the department.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 15; 1939, ch. 11, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1972, ch. 542, § 4; 1972, ch. 543, § 12; 1975, ch. 286, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-323; Acts 1981, ch. 364, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 454, § 41; 2020, ch. 690, §§ 4, 5.

Cross-References. Division of real property management, duties, §4-3-1009.

Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-1004. [Repealed.]

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-326; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 6, effective June 11, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1004 concerned the data processing section.

4-3-1005. [Reserved.]

The department of finance and administration has the power and is required to:

Prepare and submit to the governor, annually, a state budget document in accordance with title 9, chapter 4, part 51;

Prescribe forms for the preparation of the budget estimates by all the spending agencies of state government, and furnish every state officer, department and agency with a sufficient number of the budget estimate forms not later than October 15 of each year;

Prescribe the classifications of expenditures and revenues for the purposes of budget making and accounting;

Examine and recommend for approval the work program and quarterly allotments of each spending agency of state government before the appropriations made for such agency shall become available for expenditure;

Examine and recommend for approval any changes made in the work program and quarterly allotments of any spending agency during the fiscal year;

Investigate duplication of work among the departments and other agencies of state government, study the organization and administration of such departments and agencies, and formulate plans for better management and more efficient and economical operation;

Prepare and report to the governor when requested, any financial data or statistics that the governor may require, such as monthly or quarterly estimates of the state's income, and cost figures on the current operations of state institutions and other agencies; and

Examine all requisitions for purchases as the department may deem necessary, with power and authority to refuse to approve or honor any and all requisitions for purchases, except requisitions for purchases of the general assembly, state court system, attorney general and reporter, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, and state treasurer.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 373a44; Code 1932, § 269; Acts 1933, ch. 92, §§ 1(3)-1(5); 1937, ch. 33, § 16; 1939, ch. 11, § 11; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.16; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1969, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-324; Acts 2013, ch. 454, §§ 25, 29; 2020, ch. 690, § 7.

4-3-1007. Accounting powers.

The department of finance and administration has the power and is required to:

Maintain a system of general accounts embracing all the financial transactions of state government;

Examine and approve all contracts, requisitions, orders, payrolls and other documents, the purpose of which is to incur financial obligations against state government, and ascertain that moneys have been duly appropriated and allotted to meet such obligations and will be available when such obligations will become due and payable, as the commissioner deems necessary with the objective of improving accountability and managing risk as provided for in title 9, chapter 18;

Audit and approve all bills, invoices, accounts, payrolls and other evidences of claims, demands or charges against state government, and determine the regularity, legality and correctness of such claims, demands or charges, as the commissioner deems necessary with the objective of improving accountability and managing risk as provided for in title 9, chapter 18;

Inquire as needed concerning articles and materials furnished or work and labor performed, for the purpose of ascertaining that the prices, quality and amount of such articles or materials are fair, just and reasonable, and that all the requirements expressed and implied pertaining thereto have been complied with, and reject or disallow any excess;

Make available monthly reports on all receipts, expenditures, appropriations, allotments, and encumbrances of the state government to the governor, the department of audit, and the head of the department, office, or agency directly concerned;

Establish statewide accounting policies and practices that support the state's compliance with generally accepted accounting principles, state and federal laws, rules, and regulations. All such statewide policies shall become effective upon approval by the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury;

Prescribe such subsidiary accounts, including cost accounts, for the various departments, institutions, offices and agencies as may be desirable for purposes of administration, supervision and financial control;

Examine at any time the accounts of every department, institution, office or agency, receiving appropriations from the state;

Report to the attorney general and reporter for such action, civil or criminal, as the attorney general and reporter may deem necessary, and to the comptroller of the treasury, all facts showing illegality in the expenditure of public moneys, or in the collection of public revenues, or the misappropriation of public properties;

Exercise the rights, powers and duties, except the power to collect taxes, conferred by law upon the comptroller of the treasury under title 8, chapter 4, and the rights, powers and duties conferred by § 9-2-107, insofar as these provisions relate to financial administration and general accounting control of the state government, involving the keeping of general accounts, the auditing before payment of all bills, or vouchers and the authorization of all claims against the state for which appropriations have been made;

In consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, establish guidelines for the evaluation by agencies of their systems of internal accounting and administrative control as provided in title 9, chapter 18;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Supervise and regulate the making of an inventory of all removable equipment and other movable property belonging to the state government or any of its departments, institutions or agencies, with the exception of those institutions expressly exempted from the operation of title 12, chapter 3, and keep the inventory current. This subdivision (14) shall not apply to the various collections of articles, specimens and relics placed under the charge of the state museum executive director; and

Approve the use of electronic and other technological means to transfer funds whenever economically feasible, to eliminate paper documentation wherever feasible, and to increase fiscal efficiency and effectiveness.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 373a44; Code 1932, § 269; Acts 1933, ch. 92, §§ 1(3)-1(5); 1937, ch. 33, § 24; 1939, ch. 11, § 12; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.24; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-326; T.C.A., § 4-325; Acts 1975, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 129, § 2; 1987, ch. 149, § 4; 1987, ch. 150, § 4; 2009, ch. 106, §§ 2, 4; 2018, ch. 821, § 18; 2020, ch. 690, §§ 8-14.

Cross-References. Audit of accounts and financial records of the state government, and of any department, institution, office or agency thereof, by the department of audit, §4-3-304.

General account of state treasurer, reconciling to balances maintained by commissioner of finance and administration, §8-5-109.

General ledger of state treasurer, reconciling with general ledger of commissioner of finance and administration, §8-5-107.

4-3-1008. Preparation of uniform rules and regulations for payment of travel expenses for officers and employees.

The department of finance and administration, with the approval of the governor, has the power and is required to:

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Prepare uniform rules and regulations for the payment of travel expenses for officers and employees of all state departments, institutions and agencies. It is the legislative intent that such rules and regulations provide that an employee under normal circumstances shall be responsible for bearing travel expenses for no more than thirty (30) days from the date of filing a claim, subject to an audit of the claim as required. The commissioner is further authorized to prepare special regulations when the commissioner determines that special circumstances necessitate them. Proposed uniform rules and regulations and proposed special regulations shall become effective upon approval by the attorney general and reporter. Prior to filing with the attorney general and reporter, the commissioner shall submit the proposed uniform rules and regulations and proposed special regulations to the comptroller of the treasury for comment.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44a; 1939, ch. 11, § 28; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.46 (Williams, § 255.47); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 91, § 3; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 13, 14; 1975, ch. 123, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-327; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 624, § 1; 1994, ch. 669, § 2; 2020, ch. 690, §§ 15-17.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Acts 1994, ch. 669, § 1 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that:

“(1) the casualty risk program which was administered by the department of finance and administration shall be transferred to, and administered by, the department of the treasury on and after July 1, 1994;

“(2) all staff, staff positions, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of the program shall be transferred to the department of the treasury;

“(3) references to the department of finance and administration relative to the casualty risk program appearing in Tennessee Code Annotated shall be deemed to be references to the department of the treasury. The code commission is directed to change references to the existing names of officials, offices, agencies and entities, wherever they appear in Tennessee Code Annotated, to conform to the name of officials, offices, agencies and entities created by the provisions of that act. The code commission is authorized to make grammatical changes in the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated to effectuate such changes; and

“(4) all rules, policies, and decisions related to the casualty risk program promulgated or issued by the department of finance and administration prior to, and in effect on July 1, 1994, shall remain in force and effect and shall be administered and enforced by the department of the treasury until duly amended, repealed, expired, modified or superseded.”

Cross-References. Department of general services, centralization of services, §4-3-1105.

4-3-1009. Powers relating to public buildings and property.

The department of finance and administration has the power to:

Prepare or cause to be prepared general plans and preliminary sketches and estimates for the public buildings to be erected for any department;

Have general supervision and care of storerooms, offices and buildings leased for the use of the state government or any department, office or institution thereof; and

Perform the duties with respect to the inventory of state property set forth in title 12, chapter 2.

The department, through its division of real property management, has the authority and responsibility of allocating space in the Knoxville state office building and the Knoxville office building annex, but such authority does not extend to the Knoxville supreme court building.

The commissioner, through the division of real property management, has the authority and responsibility to review periodically the contract terms of leased facilities and to analyze proposed contract terms of leased facilities to determine if, whether for financial or program purposes, it is in the best interest of the state to directly own the facility. If the commissioner determines that direct ownership by the state is in the best interest, such recommendation shall be presented to the governor.

Upon the approval by the governor for any recommendation that will cost more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), the commissioner shall present a recommendation to the fiscal review committee. Upon the approval by the fiscal review committee, the commissioner shall present a recommendation to the state funding board, including the analysis supporting the determination as to the best interest of the state, the anticipated cost, the funds currently appropriated for the lease payments, and any available debt authority.

Upon approval by the governor for any recommendation that will cost one million dollars ($1,000,000) or less, the commissioner shall present a recommendation to the state funding board, including the analysis supporting the determination as to the best interest of the state, the anticipated cost, the funds currently appropriated for the lease payments, and any available debt authority.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 33; 1925, ch. 95, § 1; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a85b, 3079a223b1; Code 1932, §§ 308, 1033; Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 54, 55; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.54 (Williams, §§ 255.57, 255.58); Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-309; Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1972, ch. 543, § 15; 1977, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-328; Acts 1980, ch. 741, §§ 6-9; 2003, ch. 224, § 1.

4-3-1010. Posting of report of travel and expense reimbursements on state website.

In addition to their other powers and duties, the department of finance and administration and its commissioner are vested with all the authority, powers and duties given them by title 12, chapter 2.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

The commissioner of finance and administration shall cause to be posted on the official website of the state a report that contains all out-of-state travel expenditures and any expense reimbursements made for the expenditures to the governor, any member of the governor's cabinet, and cabinet level staff in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations of the state or any policy of the governor; provided, however, that information shall not be posted if the out-of-state travel occurred for the purpose of recruiting industry or economic development in the state and the information, in the judgment of the commissioner, has the potential to harm contract negotiations or otherwise place the state at a competitive disadvantage in seeking industrial or economic development opportunities. For the purposes of this subsection (c), “out-of-state travel expenditures” includes: expenses for which corresponding reimbursements are made; and direct travel expenditures, including airfare, travel, hotel, and any other expenses paid for directly by using a state-approved vendor or with the use of a state-issued payment card. The report shall include the purpose of the expenditures and any reimbursements made, and shall be reported by the person making the expenditures. The initial report shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days following the last day of April 2006 and shall include all payments made from the first day of January 2006, until the last day of March 2006. Thereafter, the report shall be updated quarterly, no later than fifteen (15) days following the end of the quarter. The reports shall remain on the website until one (1) month following the end of the governor's term of office. The last quarter reported in each such term shall include the period of time from the last quarter reported until the regular November election at which the next governor will be elected, and the first report in each governor's term shall include the period of time from the regular November election until the end of the first quarter.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1977, ch. 392, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-323; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 699, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 45; 2015, ch. 123, § 2; 2016, ch. 797, § 11; 2018, ch. 616, § 1; 2020, ch. 690, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Section 67-5-2505, referred to in (a), was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 883, § 12, effective July 1, 2014.

4-3-1011. Background checks of certain employees and contractors.

As a condition of employment, the department of finance and administration is authorized to require its employees and contractors who have elevated and privileged access to data and personal information of state employees or citizens, or who support a governmental department, agency, office, or other entity whose employees, contractors, or vendors are subject to federal fingerprint background check requirements, to supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history background check to be performed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The department shall develop a policy identifying which employees and contractors must supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a background check as a condition of employment.

Acts 2020, ch. 689, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1011, concerning certification of board fees, was transferred to § 9-4-5117 by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 13, effective May 16, 2013.

4-3-1012. Transfer of office of energy management functions relating to state buildings and state-owned facilities.

The state building energy management program shall be transferred from the department of general services to the department of finance and administration, as to any functions related to the energy management program for state buildings and state-owned facilities. All staff, staff positions, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of the functions referenced above shall be transferred to the department of finance and administration. Energy management functions not related to state buildings and state-owned facilities shall remain with the department of general services.

The duties of the department relative to energy management shall include:

Defining and implementing specific yearly conservation/energy management goals for state-owned facilities in coordination with the state architect's office and the state building commission;

Defining and implementing an energy efficiency code for future state buildings to include a review of renewable options by means of life-cycle analysis. This life-cycle analysis of renewable options shall be mandatory;

Developing and implementing, in coordination with the department of general services, a formalized monitoring and analyzing schedule for utility data from state buildings, including both costs and usage;

Developing and implementing an energy management program for state government; and

Preparing an annual report on the activities of the department relative to energy management. The department shall publish the report on the department's website and shall submit the report to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, the chairs of the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the chairs of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives, or their successor committees. The report shall include savings realized by the state as a result of the office's activities expressed in both units of energy saved and monetary cost-avoidance.

The energy management program described in subsection (b) may include, but is not limited to, implementing energy cost saving measures in buildings under the jurisdiction of the state building commission. The measures may include, but shall not be limited to, maintenance, repair or replacement of lighting and mechanical equipment and related controls. Energy cost saving measures may be implemented through contracts with energy professionals, including, but not limited to, energy service companies, commissioning and retro commissioning firms and agencies and energy auditing consultants. Such contracts are subject to approval by the state building commission. All departments, institutions and agencies having control of, or responsibility for, the management or operation of buildings under the jurisdiction of the state building commission shall cooperate with state building energy management in implementing energy cost saving measures.

Acts 1999, ch. 457, § 7; 2008, ch. 717, §§ 4, 5; 2009, ch. 529, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 604, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For an order transferring management and operation of the Division of Real Property Administration from the Department of Finance and Administration to the Department of General Services, see Executive Order No. 7 (September 30, 2011).

Acts 2009, ch. 529, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Clean Energy Future Act of 2009.”

For the Preamble to the Tennessee Clean Energy Future Act of 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 529.

Acts 2009, ch. 529, § 30 provided that the provisions of the act, which amended subsection (a) and added subsection (c), shall be subject to sunset review pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, in 2014.

4-3-1013. Authority to develop prescription drug programs and to contract with pharmacy benefits managers (PBMs).

The TennCare bureau is authorized to develop prescription drug programs and to contract with one (1) or more pharmacy benefit managers (PBMs) or other appropriate third party contractors to administer all or a portion of such prescription drug programs for the TennCare program. It is the legislative intent that, insofar as practical, any such pharmacy programs shall be developed and implemented in a manner that seeks to minimize undue disruption in successful drug therapies for current TennCare enrollees.

Under such a contract, a PBM may be directed by the TennCare bureau to:

Provide information to the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee for making recommendations related to a state preferred drug list (PDL);

Provide claims processing and administrative services for the TennCare program;

Provide data on utilization patterns to the bureau of TennCare, the department of finance and administration, TennCare managed care organizations, the University of Tennessee Health Science Center, and other entities determined by the TennCare bureau;

Conduct prospective and retrospective drug utilization review as directed by the bureau of TennCare;

Establish procedures for determining potential liability of third party payers, including, but not limited to, Medicare and private insurance companies, for persons receiving pharmacy services through the state of Tennessee;

Maintain a retail pharmacy network to provide prescription drugs through state programs;

Set pharmacy reimbursement rates and dispensing fee schedules necessary to maintain an adequate retail pharmacy network and increase the cost-effectiveness of state pharmacy purchases;

Negotiate supplemental rebates with pharmaceutical manufacturers for prescription drug expenditures;

Propose other initiatives to the bureau of TennCare to maintain or improve patient care while reducing prescription drug costs; and

Provide other services as directed by the bureau of TennCare.

The state TennCare program shall be authorized to receive one hundred percent (100%) of all rebates and any other financial incentives directly or indirectly resulting from the state's contract with any PBM.

The PBM contract may include performance goals and financial incentives for success or failure in attaining those goals. It is the legislative intent that such goals and incentives shall include the reliable and timely performance of any system of prior authorization that may be implemented pursuant to pharmacy programs authorized by this section.

To the extent permitted by federal law and the TennCare waiver, the bureau of TennCare may implement, either independently or in combination with a PDL, cost saving measures for pharmaceutical services including, but not limited to, tiered co-payments, reference pricing, prior authorization, step therapy requirements, exclusion from coverage of drugs or classes of drugs, mandating the use of generic drugs, and mandating the use of therapeutic equivalent drugs.

The TennCare bureau shall be required to annually report to the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare, the health and welfare committee of the senate, and to the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives concerning pharmacy benefits under the medical assistance program provided pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, on or before January 15 of each calendar year, beginning on January 15, 2013. The report shall specifically report on the use and cost of opioids and other controlled substances in the program.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 2; 2004, ch. 673, § 18; 2006, ch. 915, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 6(a); 2012, ch. 1031, § 5; 2013, ch. 236, § 49; 2016, ch. 797, § 8; 2019, ch. 345, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 915, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “TennCare Pharmacy Cost to Dispense Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006, ch. 915, §§ 3 and 4 provided that the implementation of the provisions of the act, which added subsection (f), shall be subject to the availability of funding for such purpose; and that it is the legislative intent that the act shall be funded from state, federal, foundation or other private funds or from any combination of such funds.

Acts 2006, ch. 915 was not funded in the general appropriations act for the 2006-2007 fiscal year. On August 7, 2006, the TennCare bureau advised the fiscal review committee that no private funding source has been obtained. On August 11, 2006, the fiscal review committee informed the Tennessee code commission that “[i]f private funds are not provided, Public Chapter 915 would be null and void for lack of a timely appropriation providing the estimated first year's funding, as required by Article II, Section 24 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of the Bureau of TennCare to negotiate supplemental manufacturer rebates for TennCare prescription drug purchases, OAG 05-001, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/05/05).

4-3-1014. Authority to create prescription drug purchase program.

In accordance with applicable law:

The department of finance and administration is authorized to create a program whereby local government entities, including, but not limited to county jails, can purchase prescription drugs through state methods at reduced prices;

The department of general services is authorized to sell drugs to participating local entities that have certified pharmacists on staff or require wholesalers contracting with the department of general services to sell prescription drugs to participating local entities at discounted rates.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by the act, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of the act that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

4-3-1015. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 913, §§ 2-4; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 19, effective June 11, 2020.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-3-1015 (Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 51), concerning transfers from funds, reserve accounts and programs to the state general fund, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1015 concerned EFFECTs position in state government to establish accountability process.